Hawaii statutes.
§11-114 Order of offices on ballot.
The order of offices on a ballot shall be arranged substantially as follows:
first, president and vice president of the United States; next, United States
senators; next, United States house of representatives; next, governor and
lieutenant governor; next, state senators; next, state representatives; and
next, county offices. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §1(gg); am L
1980, c 264, §1(h)]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next